apertium-en.en.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

  <!-- Define the alphabet below. -->
  <alphabet>aAbBcCdDÐeEfFgGhHiIJkKlLmMnNoOpPqQrRsStTuUvVwWxXyYzZ</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <!-- Define symbol definitions within <sdef> here. -->
<!--
    <sdef n="n"               c="Noun"/>
-->
    <sdef n="t"               c="Thing"/>
    <sdef n="np"              c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"           c="Verb, lexical"/>
<!--
    <sdef n="vbmod"           c="Modal verb"/>
-->
    <sdef n="tmmood"           c="Time mood"/> 
    <sdef n="vaux"            c="Auxiliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"           c="'To be' verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"         c="'To have' verb"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"          c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"          c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"          c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="pr"              c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="adv"             c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="ij"              c="Interjection"/>
<!--
    <sdef n="adj"             c="Adjective"/>
-->
    <sdef n="tsuch"             c="Thing such"/>
    <sdef n="tout"             c="Thing outshow"/>

<!--
    <sdef n="prn"             c="Pronoun"/>
-->
    <sdef n="tw"             c="Thing wide"/>

    <sdef n="attr"            c="Attributive"/>
    <sdef n="top"             c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"             c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"             c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="org"             c="Organisation"/>
    <sdef n="al"              c="Altres / misc proper nouns"/>

<!--
    <sdef n="pers"            c="Personal pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="ref"             c="Reflexive pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="res"             c="Reciprocal pronoun"/>
-->
    <sdef n="wt"            c="Wide thing"/>

    <sdef n="det"             c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="pos"             c="Possessive"/>

    <sdef n="p1"              c="1st person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"              c="2nd person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"              c="3rd person"/>

    <sdef n="nt"              c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="ut"              c="Utrum"/>
    <sdef n="f"               c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"               c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="un"              c="No gender"/>

    <sdef n="sg"              c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="du"              c="Dual"/>
    <sdef n="pl"              c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"              c="Singular / plural"/>

    <sdef n="ind"             c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"             c="Definite"/>

    <sdef n="nom"             c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="acc"             c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"             c="Genitive"/>

    <sdef n="dem"             c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="itg"             c="Question word / interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"             c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="neg"             c="Negative"/>
<!--
    <sdef n="emph"            c="Emphatic"/>
-->
    <sdef n="tell"            c="Tell"/>

    <sdef n="inf"             c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pres"            c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="imp"             c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pret"            c="Preterite"/>
    <sdef n="pp"              c="Perfect participle"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"            c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="pasv"            c="Passive"/>
    <sdef n="actv"            c="Active voice"/>

    <sdef n="sint"            c="Synthetic (of adjectives)"/>
    <sdef n="pst"             c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp"            c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"             c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="steadw"             c="Stead waymark"/>


    <sdef n="ord"             c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="acr"             c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="unc"             c="Uncountable"/>

    <sdef n="num"             c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="sent"            c="Sentence end"/>
    <sdef n="cm"              c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="apos"            c="Apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="guio"            c="Dash"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"            c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"            c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"           c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"           c="Right quote"/>

    <sdef n="compound-only-L" c="May only be the left-side of a compound"/>
    <sdef n="compound-R"      c="May be the right-side of a compound, or a full word"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <!-- Define paradigms within <pardef> here. -->
         <pardef n="st/and__vblex">
      <e i=""><p><l>and</l><r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e i=""><p><l>and</l><r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<!--
      <e i=""><p><l>ands</l><r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
-->
<!--
      <e i=""><p><l>ood</l><r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
-->
      <e i=""><p><l>ood</l><r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<!--
      <e i=""><p><l>anding</l><r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
-->
    
   <e i=""><p><l>anding</l><r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
<!--
      <e i=""><p><l>anding</l><r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
-->
    </pardef>
        <pardef n="noinf__t">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="t"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="reg__t">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="t"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="t"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="t"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
        <pardef n="regOld__t">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="t"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="t"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="t"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   <pardef n="regE__t">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="t"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="t"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="t"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    
    
    <pardef n="noinf__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    <pardef n="reg__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ed</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    <pardef n="regE__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>d</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    <pardef n="penReg__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ed</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    
        <pardef n="dblB__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bs</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bed</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
        <pardef n="dblD__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ds</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ded</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

    <pardef n="dblG__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gs</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ged</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    <pardef n="dblP__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ps</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ped</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

<e lm="hut"><i>hut</i><par n="reg__t"/></e>
<e lm="cow chip"><i>cow<b/>chip</i><par n="noinf__t"/></e>
<e lm="murphy potato"><i>murphy<b/>potato</i><par n="noinf__t"/></e>
<e lm="bridge"><i>bridge</i><par n="reg__t"/></e>
<e lm="hare"><i>hare</i><par n="reg__t"/></e>
<e lm="flea"><i>flea</i><par n="reg__t"/></e>
<e lm="latch"><i>latch</i><par n="regE__t"/></e>
<e lm="catch"><i>catch</i><par n="regE__t"/></e>
<e lm="lav"><i>lav</i><par n="reg__t"/></e>
<e lm="boy"><i>boy</i><par n="reg__t"/></e>
<e lm="lucre"><i>lucre</i><par n="noinf__t"/></e>
<e lm="beat"><i>beat</i><par n="noinf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="win"><i>win</i><par n="noinf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="press"><i>press</i><par n="penReg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mob"><i>mob</i><par n="penReg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="crowd"><i>crowd</i><par n="penReg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="thrash"><i>thrash</i><par n="reg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="work over"><i>work<b/>over</i><par n="noinf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beat up"><i>beat<b/>up</i><par n="noinf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drub"><i>drub</i><par n="dblB__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="scream"><i>scream</i><par n="reg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="look"><i>look</i><par n="reg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="watch"><i>watch</i><par n="penReg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="irrigate"><i>irrigate</i><par n="regE__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sop"><i>sop</i><par n="dblP__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="souse"><i>souse</i><par n="regE__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="disorder"><i>disorder</i><par n="reg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="unhinge"><i>unhinge</i><par n="regE__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="toilet"><i>toilet</i><par n="reg__t"/></e>
<e lm="public"><i>public</i><par n="noinf__t"/></e>
<e lm="soft touch"><i>soft<b/>touch</i><par n="noinf__t"/></e>
<e lm="shelf"><i>shelf</i><par n="reg__t"/></e>
<e lm="buttermilk"><i>buttermilk</i><par n="noinf__t"/></e>
<e lm="daughter"><i>daughter</i><par n="reg__t"/></e>
<e lm="hand"><i>hand</i><par n="noinf__t"/></e>
<e lm="letch"><i>letch</i><par n="noinf__t"/></e>
<e lm="nose"><i>nose</i><par n="reg__t"/></e>
<e lm="supple"><i>supple</i><par n="reg__t"/></e>
<e lm="wool"><i>wool</i><par n="noinf__t"/></e>
<e lm="knock"><i>knock</i><par n="reg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="adhere"><i>adhere</i><par n="regE__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gossip"><i>gossip</i><par n="reg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prate"><i>prate</i><par n="regE__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="put on clothes"><i>put<b/>on<b/>clothes</i><par n="noinf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dress"><i>dress</i><par n="penReg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="run"><i>run</i><par n="reg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="interrogate"><i>interrogate</i><par n="regE__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drink"><i>drink</i><par n="noinf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="booze"><i>booze</i><par n="regE__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tipple"><i>tipple</i><par n="noinf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="smell"><i>smell</i><par n="reg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slide"><i>slide</i><par n="regE__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wash"><i>wash</i><par n="penReg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wash up"><i>wash<b/>up</i><par n="noinf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="constabulary"><i>constabulary</i><par n="noinf__t"/></e>
<e lm="devil"><i>devil</i><par n="noinf__t"/></e>
<e lm="boss"><i>boss</i><par n="regE__t"/></e>
<e lm="gaffer"><i>gaffer</i><par n="regE__t"/></e>
<e lm="honcho"><i>honcho</i><par n="regE__t"/></e>
<e lm="chief"><i>chief</i><par n="regE__t"/></e>
<e lm="foreman"><i>foreman</i><par n="regE__t"/></e>
<e lm="gaffer"><i>gaffer</i><par n="regE__t"/></e>
<e lm="chairman"><i>chairman</i><par n="regE__t"/></e>
<e lm="hurt"><i>hurt</i><par n="noinf__t"/></e>
<e lm="ear"><i>ear</i><par n="reg__t"/></e>
<e lm="fix"><i>fix</i><par n="penReg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="killed"><i>killed</i><par n="noinf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="consume"><i>consume</i><par n="regE__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="exhaust"><i>exhaust</i><par n="reg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wipe out"><i>wipe<b/>out</i><par n="noinf__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="harass"><i>harass</i><par n="penReg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="get at"><i>get<b/>at</i><par n="reg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="irritate"><i>irritate</i><par n="regE__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rag"><i>rag</i><par n="dblG__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vex"><i>vex</i><par n="penReg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tire"><i>tire</i><par n="regE__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fag"><i>fag</i><par n="dblG__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wear"><i>wear</i><par n="reg__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wear out"><i>wear<b/>out</i><par n="noinf__vblex"/></e>
